Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2080YH (3) 91 ss/ns H.F. 286 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 68A.507 Contribution limits for 1 political committees. 2 1. For the purposes of this section, âelection campaign 3 cycleâ means the time period between elections for a particular 4 office. Each primary, general, and special election is a 5 separate election campaign cycle. Separate contribution limits 6 for each type of election for a particular office, including 7 primary, general, and special elections, apply in an election 8 campaign cycle. 9 2. A person shall not make, and a political committee shall 10 not accept, any contribution which will cause the total amount 11 of the personâs contributions to the political committee to 12 exceed five thousand dollars. 13